Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1193.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 36, chapter 1, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-104.01, to read: START_STATUTE36-104.01. Sale of information; prohibition; definition A. The department may not sell any personal identifying information of any individual whom the department licenses or certificates pursuant to this title or title 32. the personal identifying information of a licensee or certificate holder is confidential and, if a request for the personal identifying information is made for a commercial purpose, the personal identifying information is exempt from title 39, chapter 1, article 2. B. for the purposes of this section, "personal identifying information" includes: 1. A social security number, passport number, driver license number or taxpayer identification number. 2. A personal address, personal email address or personal telephone number. 3. A biometric record, including a photographic image, a fingerprint, a retinal scan, a voice signature or facial geometry. 4. Bulk information that when combined with other request details may pose a privacy risk, including: (a) Date of birth. (b) Place of birth. (c) Race. (d) Religion. (e) Geographic indicators. (f) Employment information. (g) Education information.END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Title 36, chapter 21.1, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 36-2202.02, to read: START_STATUTE36-2202.02. Sale or disclosure of information; prohibition; exception; definition A. The department may not sell or disclose any personal identifying information of an emergency medical care technician. the personal identifying information of an emergency medical care technician is confidential and, if a request for the personal identifying information is made for a commercial purpose, the personal identifying information is exempt from title 39, chapter 1, article 2. The department may disclose personal identifying information of an emergency medical care technician with the emergency medical care techniciaN's consent that includes the information that may be disclosed and the purposes for the disclosure. B. The department may disclose information that has been de-identified or that is in an aggregated form and that does not reasonably allow the identification of an emergency medical care technician. c. tHIS SECTION DOES NOT PROHIBIT THE DEPARTMENT FROM SHARING INFORMATION RELATING TO THE APPLICATION FOR licensure OR the LICENSURE OF AN EMERGENCY MEDICAL CARE TECHNICIAN WITH ANOTHER REGULATORY ENTITY, INCLUDING A COMMISSION THAT ADMINISTERS A LICENSURE COMPACT. D. This section does not prevent the department from disclosing information pertaining to an emergency medical technician's licensing history or record of disciplinary actions pursuant to section 36-2220. E. for the purposes of this section, "personal identifying information" includes: 1. A social security number, passport number, driver license number or taxpayer identification number. 2. A personal address, personal email address or personal telephone number. 3. A biometric record, including a photographic image, a fingerprint, a retinal scan, a voice signature or facial geometry. 4. Bulk information that when combined with other request details may pose a privacy risk, including: (a) Date of birth. (b) Place of birth. (c) Race. (d) Religion. (e) Geographic indicators. (f) Employment information. (g) Education information. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 19, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.